Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3487.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 13D.065, is amended to read: 13D.065 USE OF SOCIAL MEDIA. new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Use by members. new text end The use of social media by members of a public body does not violate this chapter so long as the social media use is limited to exchanges with all members of the general public. For purposes of this section, email is not considered a type of social media. new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Broadcast use. new text end new text begin (a) A public body may use social media to live broadcast a meeting subject to this chapter. A public body is not required to offer a social media comment feature during a broadcast authorized under this subdivision. If a social media comment feature is offered as a part of the broadcast, comments posted by members of the public during the broadcast are not considered government records under section 15.17 or 138.17 unless the public body's required notice under section 13D.04 and this subdivision provides that the comments are a part of the meeting record. A public body that accepts comments posted in a social media comment feature during a broadcast as public testimony must establish rules of order for the comments and their discussion by the public body. new text end new text begin (b) A public body that uses social media to live broadcast a meeting pursuant to this subdivision must state in the required notice under section 13D.04 that social media broadcasting will occur and provide information about how the broadcast may be accessed. If a public comment period is offered during the meeting, the notice must state the process for the submission of public comments before or during the meeting from individuals viewing the meeting remotely in order to be included in the meeting record. If a social media comment feature will be offered as a part of the broadcast, the treatment of such comments for the purposes of public testimony and the meeting record must be stated in the public notice. new text end new text begin (c) Nothing in this subdivision authorizes a public body to conduct a meeting through social media for the purposes of section 13D.015, 13D.02, or 13D.021 if the social media technology does not meet the requirements for interactive technology under this chapter. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end